Arkansas, session 2025, HB1781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-9-302, concerning abortion clinics and
health centers, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(j)(1) A clinic, health center, or other facility in which a pregnancy
of a woman known to be pregnant is willfully terminated or aborted in any
gestational age, including nonsurgical abortions, shall be licensed by the
department under this section.
(2) A clinic, health center, or other facility licensed under
subdivision (j)(1) of this section shall meet all requirements for licensure
as an ambulatory surgery center.

SECTION 2. Contingent effective date.
Section 1 of this act shall become effective only upon the
*JMB525*
03/13/2025 8:30:59 AM JMB525

HB1781
certification by the Attorney General that:
(1) The State of Arkansas is enjoined from preventing a person
from purposely performing or attempting to perform an abortion except to save
the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency under Arkansas Human Life
Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq., or the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection
Act, § 5-61-401 et seq.; or
(2) The Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq.,
or the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, § 5-61-401 et seq., have been
repealed or amended in whole or in part to allow a person to purposely
perform or attempt to perform an abortion except to save the life of a
pregnant woman in a medical emergency.

























03/13/2025 8:30:59 AM JMB525